California statutes. Insurance Code
For policies or certificates issued on or after January 1, 2017, that contain an alternate plan of care provision pursuant to Section 10231.3, if an insurer and insured cannot agree on the terms of an alternate plan of care, the insurer shall provide a written explanation to the policyholder or certificate holder as to the specific reason or reasons why the agreement cannot be reached. The insurer shall provide the written explanation within 60 days of the insurer’s determination that an agreement cannot be reached.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 589, Sec. 4.   (SB 1091)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.10.

Termination of long-term care insurance shall be without prejudice to any benefits payable for institutionalization if that institutionalization began while the long-term care insurance was in force and continues without interruption after termination. This extension of benefits beyond the period the long-term care insurance was in force may be limited to the duration of the benefit period, if any, or to payment of the maximum benefits and may be subject to any policy waiting period, and all other applicable provisions of the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 767, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.14.

(a) Individual long-term care insurance policies shall contain a renewability provision. This provision shall be appropriately captioned, shall appear on the first page of the policy, and shall clearly disclose the term of coverage for which the policy is initially issued, the terms and conditions under which the policy may be renewed, and whether or not the issuer has the right to change the premium. If this right exists, the policy provisions shall clearly and concisely describe each circumstance under which the premium may change.

(b) Except for riders or endorsements by which the insurer effectuates a request made in writing by the insured under an individual long-term care insurance policy, all riders or endorsements added to an individual long-term care insurance policy after date of issue or at reinstatement or renewal which reduce or eliminate benefits or coverage in the policy shall require signed acceptance by the individual insured. After the date of policy issue, any rider or endorsement which increases benefits or coverage with a concomitant increase in premium during the policy term shall be agreed to in writing signed by the insured, unless the increased benefits or coverage are required by law. If a separate additional premium is charged for benefits provided in connection with riders or endorsements, that premium charge shall be set forth in the policy, rider, or endorsement.

(c) If a long-term
 care insurance policy or certificate contains any limitations with respect to preexisting conditions, those limitations shall appear as a separate paragraph of the policy or certificate and shall be labeled as “preexisting condition limitations.”

(d) A long-term care insurance policy or certificate containing any limitations or conditions for eligibility shall set forth in a separate paragraph of the policy or certificate a description of those limitations or conditions, including any required number of days of confinement, and shall label that paragraph “Limitations or Conditions on Eligibility for Benefits.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.16.

(a) Long-term care insurance application forms shall include a question designed to elicit information as to whether the proposed insurance is intended to replace any other accident and sickness or long-term care insurance presently in force. A supplementary application or other form to be signed by the applicant containing such a question may be used.

(b) Upon determining that a sale will involve replacement, an insurer, other than an insurer using direct response
 solicitation methods, or its agent shall furnish the applicant, prior to issuance or delivery of a policy or certificate, a notice regarding replacement of accident and sickness or long-term care coverage. One copy of this notice shall be retained by the applicant and an additional copy signed by the applicant shall be retained by the insurer. The required notice shall be provided in the following form: 
“NOTICE TO APPLICANT REGARDING REPLACEMENT OF ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS OR LONG-TERM CARE INSURANCE 
According to (your application) (information you have furnished), you intend to lapse or otherwise terminate existing accident and sickness or long-term care insurance and replace it with long-term care insurance coverage to be issued by (company name) Insurance Company. Your new coverage provides thirty (30) days within which you may decide, without cost, whether
 you desire to keep the coverage. For your own information and protection, you should be aware of and seriously consider certain factors which may affect the insurance protection available to you under the new coverage.

(1) Health conditions which you may presently have (preexisting conditions), may not be immediately or fully covered under the new coverage. This could result in denial or delay in payment of benefits under the new coverage, whereas a similar claim might have been payable under your present coverage.

(2) You may wish to secure the advice of your present insurer or its agent regarding the proposed replacement of your present coverage. This is not only your right, but it is also in your best interest to make sure you understand all the relevant factors involved in replacing your present coverage.

(3) If,
 after due consideration, you still wish to terminate your present coverage and replace it with new coverage, be certain to truthfully and completely answer all questions on the application concerning your medical health history. Failure to include all material medical information on an application may provide a basis for the company to deny any future claims and to refund your premium as though your coverage had never been in force. After the application has been completed and before you sign it, reread it carefully to be certain that all the information has been properly recorded. 

The above “Notice to Applicant” was delivered to me on:(Date)(Applicant’s Signature)”(c) For group coverage not subject to the 30-day return provision of Section 10232.7, the notice shall be modified to reflect the appropriate time period in which the policy may be returned and premium refunded.

(d) The replacement notice shall include the following statement except when the replacement coverage is group insurance as described in subdivision (a) of Section 10231.6:

COMPARISON TO YOUR CURRENT COVERAGE: I have reviewed your current long-term care coverage. To the best of my knowledge, the replacement of insurance involved in this transaction materially improves your position for the following reasons:____ Additional or different benefits (please specify) ______.____ No change in benefits, but lower premiums.____ Fewer benefits and lower premiums.____ Other (please specify) ______.
(Signature of Agent and Name of Insurer)(Signature of Applicant)(Date)

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.17.

For purposes of this chapter, the commissioner shall define inappropriate replacement of long-term care insurance in consultation with other interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1132, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.18.

(a) Insurers using direct response solicitation methods shall deliver a notice regarding replacement of accident and sickness or long-term care coverage to the applicant upon issuance of the policy or certificate. The required notice shall be provided in the following form: 
“NOTICE TO APPLICANT REGARDING REPLACEMENT OF ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS OR LONG-TERM CARE INSURANCE 

According to (your application) (information you have furnished), you intend to lapse or otherwise terminate existing accident and sickness or long-term care insurance and replace it with the
 long-term care insurance coverage delivered herewith issued by (company name) Insurance Company. Your new coverage provides thirty (30) days within which you may decide, without cost, whether you desire to keep the policy or certificate. For your own information and protection, you should be aware of and seriously consider certain factors which may affect the insurance protection available to you under the new coverage.

(1) Health conditions which you may presently have (preexisting conditions), may not be immediately or fully covered under the new coverage. This could result in denial or delay in payment of benefits under the new coverage, whereas a similar claim might have been payable under your present coverage.

(2) You may wish to secure the advice of your present insurer or its agent regarding the proposed replacement of your present policy coverage. This is not only your
 right, but it is also in your best interest to make sure you understand all the relevant factors involved in replacing your present coverage.

(3) (To be included only if the application is attached to the policy or certificate). If, after due consideration, you still wish to terminate your present coverage and replace it with new coverage, read the copy of the application attached to your new coverage and be sure that all questions are answered fully and correctly. Omissions or misstatements in the application could cause an otherwise valid claim to be denied. Carefully check the application and write to (company name and address) within thirty (30) days if any information is not correct and complete, or if any past medical history has been left out of the application.(Company Name)”(b) For group coverage not subject to the 30-day return provision of Section 10232.7, the notice shall be modified to reflect the appropriate time period in which the policy may be returned and premium refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 767, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.20.

The commissioner may waive a specific provision or provisions of this article with respect to a specific long-term care insurance policy or certificate upon making written findings specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), as follows:

(a) The waiver would be in the best interest of the insureds.

(b) The underlying purposes of this article could not be effectively or efficiently achieved without the waiver.

(c) Any of the following:

(1) The waiver is necessary to the development of an innovative and reasonable approach for insuring long-term care.

(2) The policy or certificate is to be issued to residents of a life care or continuing care retirement community or some other residential community for the elderly and the waiver is reasonably related to the special needs or nature of such a community.

(3) The waiver is necessary to permit long-term care insurance to be sold as part of, or in conjunction with, another insurance product.

The commissioner may condition any waiver upon compliance with alternative requirements to achieve the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 767, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.30.

(a) No insurer may deliver or issue for delivery a long-term care policy in this state unless the insurer offers at the time of application an option to purchase a shortened benefit period nonforfeiture benefit with the following features:

(1) Eligibility begins no later than after 10 years of premium payments.

(2) The lifetime maximum benefit is no less than the dollar equivalent of three months of care at the
 nursing facility per diem benefit contained in the policy or the amount of the premiums paid, whichever is greater.

(3) The same benefits covered in the policy and any riders at the time eligibility begins are payable for a qualifying claim.

(4) The lifetime maximum benefit may be reduced by the amount of any claims already paid.

(5) Cash back, extended term, and reduced paid-up forms of nonforfeiture benefits shall not be allowed.

(6) The lifetime maximum benefit amount increases proportionally with the number of years of premium payment.

(b) This section shall not apply to life insurance policies that accelerate benefits for long-term care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 947, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.35.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may require the administration by an insurer of the contingent benefit upon lapse, as described in Section 28 (A), (D) (3), (E), (F), (G), and (J) of the Long-Term Care Insurance Model Regulation promulgated by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, as adopted in September 2014, as a condition of approval or acknowledgment of a rate adjustment for a block of business for which the contingent benefit upon lapse is not otherwise available.

(b) The insurer shall notify policyholders and certificate holders of the contingent benefit upon lapse when required by the commissioner in conjunction with the implementation of a
 rate adjustment. The commissioner may require an insurer who files for such a rate adjustment to allow policyholders and certificate holders to reduce coverage pursuant to Section 10235.50 to avoid an increase in the policy’s premium amount.

(c) The commissioner may also approve any other alternative mechanism filed by the insurer in lieu of the contingent benefit upon lapse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 348, Sec. 24.   (AB 1515)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.36.

(a) When a shortened benefit period nonforfeiture benefit, as described in Section 10235.30, or a contingent benefit upon lapse, as described in Section 10235.35, is conferred, the insurer shall mail to and receive from each policyholder or certificate holder an election form which allows the policyholder or certificate holder to elect one of the following:

(1) A written designation listing the name, address, and telephone number of at least one individual, in addition to the policyholder or certificate holder, who is to receive the annual notice as described in subdivision (c).

(2) A confirmation that the
 policyholder or certificate holder designates the same person previously designated in Section 10235.40 to receive the annual notice as described in subdivision (c).

(3) A waiver signed and dated by the policyholder or certificate holder electing not to designate additional persons to receive the annual notice as described in subdivision (c). The required waiver shall read as follows:
“I understand that I have the right to designate at least one person other than myself to receive annual notification related to the
 benefit retained under this long-term care insurance policy. I elect not to designate any person other than myself to receive the notice.

___________________________________________________________

Signature of Policyholder or Certificate Holder Date”
(b) The insurer shall notify all holders of a shortened benefit period nonforfeiture benefit or a contingent benefit upon lapse at the time of the annual notice as described in subdivision (c), of the right to change the election described in subdivision (a).

(c) At the time a shortened benefit
 period nonforfeiture benefit or contingent benefit upon lapse is conferred and annually thereafter the insurer shall notify all holders of the benefit and, if elected, at least one individual designated pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) by first-class United States mail, postage prepaid, of all of the following:

(1) The availability of the shortened benefit period nonforfeiture benefit or contingent benefit upon lapse.

(2) The dollar amount of the shortened benefit period nonforfeiture benefit or contingent benefit upon lapse calculated up to 60 days prior to the date of the annual notice. The notice shall state that the amount may have been reduced if benefits were
 paid in the period subsequent to the date on which that amount was calculated.

(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the insurer for questions about the shortened benefit period nonforfeiture benefit or contingent benefit upon lapse.

(d) For individuals who hold contingent benefits upon lapse as of the effective date of this section, the insurer shall send the election form required in subdivision (a) by July 1, 2016.

(e) If, upon proper mailing by the insurer, the policyholder or certificate holder fails to return the election form described in subdivision (a) within 90 days, the failure will be deemed a waiver
 as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 544, Sec. 1.   (SB 575)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.40.

(a) An individual long-term care policy or certificate shall not be issued until the applicant has been given the right to designate at least one individual, in addition to the applicant, to receive notice of lapse or termination of a policy or certificate for nonpayment of premium. The insurer shall receive from each applicant one of the following:

(1) A written designation listing the name, address, and telephone number of at least one individual, in addition to the applicant, who is to receive notice of lapse or termination of the policy or certificate for nonpayment of premium.

(2) A waiver signed and dated by the applicant electing not to designate additional persons to receive notice. The required waiver shall read as follows:
“Protection Against Unintended Lapse.
I understand that I have the right to designate at least one person other than myself to receive notice of lapse or termination of this long-term care insurance policy for nonpayment of premium. I understand that notice will not be given until 30 days after a premium is due and unpaid. I elect not to designate any person to receive the notice.Signature of ApplicantDate”(b) The insurer shall notify the insured of the right to change the written designation, no less often than once every two years.

(c) If the policyholder or certificate holder pays the premium for a long-term care insurance policy or certificate through a payroll or pension deduction plan, the requirements contained in subdivision (a) need not be met until 60 days after the
 policyholder or certificate holder is no longer on that deduction payment plan. The application or enrollment form for a certified long-term care insurance policy or certificate shall clearly indicate the deduction payment plan selected by the applicant.

(d) An individual long-term care policy or certificate shall
 not lapse or be terminated for nonpayment of premium unless the insurer, at least 30 days before the effective date of the lapse or termination, gives notice to the insured and to the individual or individuals designated pursuant to subdivision (a), at the address provided by the insured for purposes of receiving notice of lapse or termination. Notice shall be given by first-class United States mail, postage prepaid, not less than 30 days after a premium is due and unpaid.

(e) A long-term care insurance policy or certificate shall include a provision that, in the event of lapse, provides for reinstatement of coverage, if the insurer is provided with proof of the insured’s cognitive impairment or the loss of functional capacity. This option shall be available to the insured if requested within five months after termination
 and shall allow for the collection of a past due premium, if appropriate. The standard of proof of cognitive impairment or loss of functional capacity shall not be more stringent than the benefit eligibility criteria on cognitive impairment or the loss of functional capacity contained in the policy certificate.

(f) If a universal life insurance policy includes coverage for long-term care and may lapse due to insufficient account value even if all scheduled premiums are paid on time and no loans or withdrawals are taken, then an applicant shall receive the disclosure below or a substantially similar disclosure that contains all of the information below. The disclosure shall
 be submitted to the commissioner for approval. The disclosure shall be signed and dated by the applicant and the agent. One copy of the disclosure shall be retained by the applicant and an additional copy shall be retained by the insurer. The disclosure shall be in the following form:“Disclosure of Risk of Lapse and Offer of Protection Against LapseAPPLICANT: Please review and check the appropriate line(s), and sign and date below.My agent has explained to me that the universal life insurance policy I am
applying for may lapse (terminate) due to insufficient account value, even if
I pay all the scheduled premiums on time and take no loans or withdrawals,
and that if my life insurance policy lapses then I will also lose my long-term
care
 coverage.____I have been offered a benefit that would guarantee the policy
against lapse if I pay all required premiums on time, take no 
loans or withdrawals, and comply with other policy provisions. I
have reviewed this offer.____I have been offered a policy that includes long-term care 
coverage and is guaranteed against lapse if I pay all required 
premiums on time, take no loans or withdrawals, and comply 
with other policy provisions. I have reviewed this proposal.____I have been informed by my agent that other insurers offer 
policies that include long-term care coverage and that would be 
guaranteed against lapse
 if I pay all required premiums on time 
and take no loans or withdrawals. However, the insurer of the 
policy that I am applying for does not. I understand that I will 
have to apply for insurance with a different insurance company if
I would like to purchase a policy that includes long-term care 
coverage with this kind of lapse protection.Signature of applicant Date AGENT: Please review and check the appropriate line(s), and sign and date
below.I have explained to the applicant that the universal life insurance policy the applicant is applying for may lapse due to insufficient account value, even if all scheduled premiums are paid on time and no loans or withdrawals are taken, and that if the life insurance policy lapses then the long-term care coverage will also be lost.____ I offered the applicant, and the applicant has reviewed, the following
 option(s) [check all that apply]:____An optional no-lapse guarantee
 benefit.
I have explained that a no-lapse guarantee benefit would
guarantee the policy against lapse if all required premiums are paid
on time and no loans or withdrawals are taken.____A different universal life policy that includes long-term care
coverage and is offered with a no-lapse guarantee benefit.
I have explained that a no-lapse guarantee benefit would guarantee
the policy against lapse if all required premiums are paid on time
and no loans or withdrawals are taken.____A whole life policy that includes long-term care coverage.
I have explained that a whole life policy is guaranteed
against lapse if all required premiums are paid on time.____A stand-alone long-term care policy.
I have explained that a stand-alone long-term care policy is
guaranteed against lapse if all required premiums are paid
on time.____I have explained that the applicant will have to apply for
insurance with a different insurance company if the applicant
would like to purchase a policy that includes long-term care
coverage and would be guaranteed against lapse if all required
 premiums are paid on time and no loans or withdrawals are taken.Signature of agent Date”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 625, Sec. 1.   (AB 1209)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.45.

(a) If a life insurance policy contains long-term care benefits and permits policy loans or cash withdrawals, then access to those loans or withdrawals shall not be prohibited or limited due to the payment of long-term care benefits, except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(1) Payment of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care shall result in no more than a pro rata reduction in the cash value of the life insurance policy. A reduction in cash value shall be proportionally equal to the percentage of death benefits accelerated to produce the accelerated death benefit payment. Future access to policy loans and cash withdrawals may
 be limited to the remaining cash value.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), payment of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care may be considered a lien against the death benefit of the life insurance policy, and access to the cash value of the life insurance policy may be restricted to the excess of the cash value over the sum of outstanding policy loans and the lien. Future access to policy loans and cash withdrawals may also be limited to the excess of the cash value over the sum of outstanding policy loans and the lien.

(3) This subdivision applies only to policies issued on or after January 1, 2021.

(b) If payment of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care results in a pro rata reduction in
 the cash value of the life insurance policy, the payment may be applied toward repayment of a pro rata portion of outstanding policy loans. The amount of the loan repayment shall be proportionally equal to the percentage of death benefits accelerated to produce the accelerated death benefit payment.

(c) At least 30 days before the expected first payment of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care, the insurer shall provide the policyholder or certificate holder with a statement that includes
 the information described in this subdivision. Alternatively, an insurer may provide the statement at the time of payment, but only if the insurer allows cancellation of the payment for at least 30 days after it is made.

(1) The statement shall be dated and shall include all of the following:

(A) An explanation of changes to the policy that have occurred as a result of the payment, or would occur as a result of the estimated payment, including, but not limited to, a prohibition or limitation of access to loans or cash withdrawals.

(B) A numerical demonstration of the
 estimated effect of the payment on any applicable remaining policy values. The demonstration shall include, if applicable, impact to the death benefit, cash value or accumulation amount, policy loan value, outstanding policy loan amount, no-lapse guarantee, policy lien, premium payments or cost of insurance
 charges, and any other values impacted by the payment.

(C) A notice stating: “WARNING: Payment of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care will reduce and may potentially eliminate your death benefit. Receipt of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care may be taxable and may also adversely affect your eligibility for Medicaid or other government entitlements. Please consult a financial advisor.”

(2) If the statement is provided before the payment date, it shall also
 include all of the following:

(A) The expected payment date.

(B) An explanation that the policyholder or certificate holder may request payment before the expected payment date.

(C) Notice that the policyholder or certificate holder may cancel the payment by contacting the insurer at the insurer’s address or telephone number at any time before the expected payment date.

(3) If the statement is provided at the time of payment, it shall also include notice that the policyholder or certificate holder may cancel the payment by contacting the insurer at the insurer’s address or telephone number within the cancellation period and returning the
 payment.

(d) The statement required by subdivision (c) is required only once per
 policyholder for an individual policy, or once per certificate holder for a group policy, and does not need to be provided for later accelerated death benefit claims by the same policyholder or certificate holder.

(e) No later than 30 days after every payment of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care, or 45 days after the first payment of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care, the insurer shall provide the policyholder or certificate holder with a
 statement summarizing the effect of the payment on the remaining policy values. The statement shall include all of the following:

(1) The accelerated death benefits paid out during the prior month.

(2) An explanation of changes, if applicable, to the remaining death benefit, cash value or accumulation account, policy loan value, outstanding policy loan amount, no-lapse guarantee, policy lien, premium payments or cost of insurance
 charges, and any other values impacted by the payment.

(3) The amount of the remaining benefits that can be accelerated.

(f) If a policyholder or certificate holder initiates a request to take a loan or withdrawal from the cash value of a life insurance policy that accelerates benefits for long-term care, the insurer shall provide the policyholder or certificate holder with a statement that includes the information described in paragraph (3).

(1) Except for a loan that is immediately approved pursuant to paragraph (2), a request to take a loan or withdrawal shall be deemed incomplete, and the insurer shall not approve the loan or withdrawal, until the information has been provided and the policyholder or certificate holder submits a response that finalizes the request for the loan or withdrawal.

(2) The insurer may immediately approve a loan and provide the statement at the time of payment, but only if the loan is not treated as a taxable
 distribution for federal income tax purposes and the insurer permits cancellation of the loan for at least 30 days after the loan payment has been made.

(A) The insurer shall provide notice that the policyholder or certificate holder may cancel the loan by contacting the insurer at the insurer’s address or telephone number within the cancellation period and returning the loan payment.

(B) At the time the loan is requested, the insurer shall provide an option to receive the statement before the loan request is finalized. If the policyholder or certificate holder elects this option, the loan request shall be deemed incomplete, and the insurer shall not approve the loan, until the statement has been provided and the policyholder or certificate holder submits a response that finalizes the request for the loan.

(3) The statement shall be dated and shall include all of the following:

(A) An explanation of changes to the policy that would occur as a result of the loan or withdrawal.

(B) A numerical demonstration of the
 estimated effect of the payment on
 any applicable remaining policy values. The demonstration shall include, if applicable, impact to the death benefit, cash value or accumulation amount, policy loan value, outstanding policy loan amount, no-lapse guarantee, policy lien, premium payments or cost of insurance charges, daily, monthly, or lifetime long-term care benefits, and any other values impacted by the payment.

(C) If a policyholder or certificate holder is initiating a request for a loan, a notice stating: “WARNING: Loans may reduce and potentially eliminate your death benefit and your long-term care benefits. Receipt of a loan may adversely affect your eligibility for Medicaid or other government entitlements, and loan proceeds may be taxable if the loan is not
 repaid and the policy is surrendered or lapses. Please consult a financial advisor.”

(D) If a policyholder or certificate holder is initiating a request for a withdrawal, a notice stating: “WARNING: Cash withdrawals may reduce and potentially eliminate your death benefit and your long-term care benefits. Receipt of a cash withdrawal may be taxable and may also adversely affect your eligibility for Medicaid or other government benefits or entitlements. Please consult a financial advisor.”

(E) A description of circumstances in which a loan or withdrawal may result in or contribute to the lapse of the policy.

(F) If applicable, a hypothetical demonstration of how loan repayment may be deducted from a future payment of an accelerated death benefit for long-term care.

(G) If applicable, a notice explaining the rate at which the loan will accrue interest and stating the projected outstanding loan amount after five years, assuming that the interest rate does not change, no loan repayments are made, and no additional loans are taken.

(g) The statements and notices required by this section shall be in at least 12-point type.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 27.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.50.

(a) A policy or certificate shall include a provision that gives the policyholder or certificate holder the right, exercisable any time after the first year, to retain the policy or certificate while reducing coverage and lowering the premium.

(1) The policyholder or certificate holder shall have the option to reduce coverage and lower the premium in the following ways:

(A) Reducing the lifetime maximum benefit.

(B) Reducing the daily, weekly, or monthly benefit amounts.

(C) Converting a “comprehensive long-term care”
 policy or certificate to a “Nursing Facility and Residential Care Facility Only” or a “Home Care Only” policy or certificate, if the insurer issues those policies or certificates for sale in the state.

(D) Reducing or eliminating the benefit adjustments provided by an inflation protection provision.

(2) Subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) shall apply to a policy issued or delivered on or after January 1, 2020.

(3) The insurer may offer other reduction options in addition to those required by paragraph (1).

(4) For a policy issued or delivered on or after January 1, 2020, the provision shall include a description of the process for requesting and implementing a
 reduction in coverage. For a policy issued or delivered before January 1, 2020, an insurer shall notify the policyholder or certificate holder of the process to request and implement a reduction in coverage.

(b) (1) The premium for a policy or certificate that is reduced in coverage shall be both of the following:

(A) Based on the issue age and underwriting class used to determine the premium for the coverage currently in force.

(B) Consistent with the policy’s approved rate table.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to any reduction in coverage, regardless of the original policy issue date.

(c) (1) If a policy or certificate contains an inflation protection provision, both of the following shall apply to a reduction in coverage:

(A) If a policyholder or certificate holder chooses to reduce a daily, weekly, monthly, or lifetime benefit amount, then the policyholder or certificate holder shall be given the option to continue inflation protection benefit adjustments in the same manner and in the same amount as the contract in force before the reduction in coverage.

(B) If a policyholder or certificate holder chooses to reduce or eliminate the benefit adjustments provided by an inflation protection provision, then the policyholder or certificate holder shall be given the option to continue the daily, weekly, monthly, and lifetime benefit
 amounts in effect at the time of the reduction.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to any reduction in coverage, regardless of the original policy issue date.

(d) If a policy or certificate is about to lapse, the insurer shall provide written notice to the insured of the options in subdivision (a) to lower the premium by reducing coverage and of the premiums applicable to the reduced coverage options. The insurer may include in the notice additional options to those required in subdivision (a). The notice shall provide the insured at least 30 days in which to elect to reduce coverage and the policy shall be reinstated without underwriting if the insured elects the reduced coverage.

(e) If a premium increases, the
 policyholder or certificate holder shall have the right to retain the policy or certificate while reducing coverage and lowering the premium.

(1) The policyholder or certificate holder shall be offered the option to reduce coverage as provided in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(A) At least one option to reduce coverage shall allow the policyholder or certificate holder to retain the policy for a premium reasonably equivalent to the one that was in effect before the rate increase.

(B) An insurer may offer other reduction options in addition to the option required by paragraph (1).

(C) An insurer’s offer shall include a
 disclosure stating that all of the reduction options may not be of equal value.

(D) The policyholder or certificate holder of a policy or certificate offered under the California Partnership for Long-Term Care Program shall be offered options to reduce coverage that would maintain certification under the program, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 22005.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The insurer may also offer other reduction options that may result in a loss of partnership status, but
 shall disclose that the options may result in a loss of partnership status and explain that loss of partnership status may reduce or eliminate policyholder or certificate holder protections.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to any premium rate increase, regardless of the original policy issue date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 534, Sec. 1.   (AB 2604)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.51.

(a) Every policy or certificate shall include a provision that gives the insured the option to elect, no less frequently than on each anniversary date after the policy or certificate is issued, to pay an extra premium for one or more riders that increase coverage in any of the following ways:

(1) Increase the amount of the per diem benefits.

(2) Increase the lifetime maximum benefit.

(3) Increase the amount of both the nursing facility per diem benefit and the home- and community-based care benefits of a comprehensive long-term care insurance policy or certificate.

(b) The premiums for the riders to increase coverage may be based on the attained age of the insured. The premium for the original policy or certificate will not be changed and will continue to be based on the insured’s age when the original policy or certificate was issued.

(c) The insurer may require the insured to undergo new underwriting, in addition to the payment of an additional premium, to qualify for the additional coverage. The insurer may restrict the age for issuance of additional coverage and restrict the aggregate amount of additional coverage an insured may acquire to the maximum age and coverage the insurer allows when
 issuing a new policy or certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 699, Sec. 16.   Effective October 6, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10235.52.

(a) Each policy shall contain a provision that, if the insurer develops new benefits or benefit eligibility or new policies with new benefits or benefit eligibility not included in the previously issued policy, the insurer shall grant current holders of its policies who are not in benefit or within the elimination period all of the following rights:
